Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.45.040

Public accounts of governmental entities held by financial institutions—Statements and reports—Contents—Filing. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

After January 1st and before April 15th of each calendar year, the state treasurer, each county, public utility district, and port district treasurer, and each treasurer of an incorporated city or town whose population exceeds 1,000 shall file with the commission:

(1) A statement under oath that no public funds under that treasurer's control were invested in any institution where the treasurer or, in the case of a county, a member of the county finance committee, held during the reporting period an office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest; or

(2) A report disclosing for the previous calendar year: (a) The name and address of each financial institution in which the treasurer or, in the case of a county, a member of the county finance committee, held during the reporting period an office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest which holds or has held during the reporting period public accounts of the governmental entity for which the treasurer is responsible; (b) the aggregate sum of time and demand deposits held in each such financial institution on December 31; and (c) the highest balance held at any time during such reporting period. The state treasurer shall disclose the highest balance information only upon a public records request under chapter 42.56 RCW. The statement or report required by this section shall be filed either with the statement required under RCW 29B.55.010 or separately.

[ 2024 c 164 s 471; 2010 c 204 s 702; 2005 c 274 s 282; 1983 c 213 s 1; 1981 c 102 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112 s 10. Formerly RCW 42.17A.570, 42.17.245.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112: See note following RCW 29B.60.020.